Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.170

Examination—Rules. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse must pass an examination in subjects determined by the *commission. The examination may be supplemented by an oral or practical examination. The *commission shall establish by rule the requirements for applicants who have failed the examination to qualify for reexamination.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 417.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

PDFRCW 18.79.170

Examination—Rules. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse must pass an examination in subjects determined by the board. The examination may be supplemented by an oral or practical examination. The board shall establish by rule the requirements for applicants who have failed the examination to qualify for reexamination.

[2024 c 239 s 8; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 417.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.